Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 14

Bank Holding Companies—Bank Structure Act of 1974

45-2-1401. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Bank Structure Act.”

Acts 1974, ch. 469, § 1; T.C.A., § 45-619; Acts 1995, ch. 165, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 165, § 6 provided that nothing in that act shall be deemed or construed as to: (i) authorize or permit, prior to June 1, 1997, merger or consolidation of any bank having its home state, as defined in §45-2-1402, in Tennessee with or into any bank which does not have its home state in Tennessee; or (ii) authorize or permit, whether before, on, or after June 1, 1997, a bank which does not have its home state in Tennessee to establish or acquire a branch in Tennessee by any means other than merger or consolidation, on or after June 1, 1997, of such bank with or into a bank having its home state in Tennessee.

Cross-References. Negotiable instruments, title 47, ch. 3.

Tennessee Reciprocal Banking Act, title 45, ch. 12.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, § 64.

Law Reviews.

The Federal Income Tax Considerations Involved in Forming and Operating a Bank Holding Company (Clayton D. Smith), 11 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 453 (1981).

45-2-1402. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Acquisition of a branch” means the acquisition of all or substantially all of the assets other than loans, cash or securities and the assumption of all or substantially all of the liabilities of or related to a branch that has been open and engaged in the business of banking for at least three (3) continuous years without the acquisition of the entire bank;

“Affiliate” means any company that controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another company;

“Appropriate regulatory official” means:

For any national bank, the comptroller of the currency of the United States; and

For any Tennessee-chartered bank, the commissioner of financial institutions, the federal deposit insurance corporation, or the board of governors of the federal reserve system, if the bank is a member bank;

“Bank” has the meaning stated in § 3(a)(1) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. § 1813(a)(1));

“Bank holding company” has the meaning set forth in § 2(a)(1) of the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956 (12 U.S.C. § 1841(a)(1));

“Branch” means a branch as defined in § 45-1-103;

“Commercial activities” means any activities in which a bank holding company, financial holding company, a national bank, or a national bank subsidiary, may not engage under federal law;

“Company” has the meaning set forth in § 2(b) of the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956 (12 U.S.C. § 1841(b));

“Control” has the meaning set forth in § 2(a)(2) of the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956 (12 U.S.C. § 1841(a)(2));

“De novo acquisition” means acquisition of shares of a bank prior to the time it is authorized to commence operations;

“De novo branch” means a branch of a bank that:

Is originally established by the bank as a branch; and

Does not become a branch of the bank as a result of:

The acquisition by the bank of an insured depository institution or a branch of an insured depository institution; or

The conversion, merger, or consolidation of the institution or branch;

“Home state” means:

With respect to a national bank, the state in which the main office of the bank is located;

With respect to a state bank, the state by which the bank is chartered; and

With respect to a bank holding company, the state in which the total deposits of all banking subsidiaries of the company are the largest on the later of:

July 1, 1966; or

The date on which the company becomes a bank holding company under the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956;

“Host state” means a state, other than the home state of a bank, in which the bank maintains or seeks to establish and maintain a branch;

“Interim bank merger” means the technique by which a new bank charter is obtained solely for the purpose of merging an existing bank into the bank for which the charter is sought, or solely for the purpose of merging the bank for which the charter is sought into an existing bank; the technique is a transaction intended to qualify the exchange of stock between the bank holding company and the stockholders of the existing bank as a reorganization within the meaning of § 368(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 368(a));

“Out-of-state bank” or “out-of-state bank holding company” means a bank or bank holding company of which Tennessee is not the home state; and

“Tennessee bank” or “Tennessee bank holding company” means a bank or bank holding company for which Tennessee is the home state of the bank or company.

Acts 1974, ch. 469, § 2; T.C.A., § 45-620; Acts 1995, ch. 165, § 2; 1996, ch. 562, § 3; 1998, ch. 742, § 1; 2001, ch. 54, § 24; 2001, ch. 140, § 1; 2003, ch. 32, § 3; 2007 ch. 5, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 165, § 6 provided that nothing in that act shall be deemed or construed as to: (i) authorize or permit, prior to June 1, 1997, merger or consolidation of any bank having its home state, as defined in §45-2-1402, in Tennessee with or into any bank which does not have its home state in Tennessee; or (ii) authorize or permit, whether before, on, or after June 1, 1997, a bank which does not have its home state in Tennessee to establish or acquire a branch in Tennessee by any means other than merger or consolidation, on or after June 1, 1997, of such bank with or into a bank having its home state in Tennessee.

Acts 2001, ch. 140, § 4 provided that should any provision of that act or the application thereof to any person or circumstance be held invalid for any reason by a final nonappealable order of any Tennessee or federal court of competent jurisdiction, then such court shall declare the entire act to be null and void in its entirety and shall give no further force or effect to it; provided, however, that any transaction that has been finally consummated in good faith pursuant to that act prior to a determination of invalidity, and which is not the subject of dispute or litigation, shall be unaffected by such determination.

Cross-References. Branch banks, §45-2-614.

Riegle-Neal Interstate Banking and Branching Efficiency Act of 1994, Pub. L. No. 103-328, 108 Stat. 2338 (1994) (codified in various sections of 12 U.S.C. (1994)).

45-2-1403. Prohibition against acquiring shares of bank in operation less than three (3) years — Exceptions.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b):

No bank holding company acting directly or indirectly shall acquire control of, merge, or consolidate with a Tennessee bank that has not been in operation for at least three (3) years; and

No out-of-state bank acting directly or indirectly shall acquire control of, merge, or consolidate with a Tennessee bank that has not been in operation for at least three (3) years.

Subsection (a) shall not prohibit the following transactions:

An interim bank merger for the purpose of acquiring control of a Tennessee bank that has been in operation for at least three (3) years, but the requirement of that period of operation shall not apply if the bank holding company owned more than fifty percent (50%) of the shares of the bank prior to the time of merger by reason of the purchase of the shares in a de novo acquisition;

Acquisition of control, merger or consolidation of any Tennessee bank in financial difficulty, as determined by the appropriate regulatory officials; provided, that the officials determine that the acquisition will protect the stockholders and depositors by maintaining financial soundness;

Acquisition of shares of stock given as collateral security upon a debt contracted in good faith; provided, that:

The acquisition is necessary to prevent loss upon the debt;

The making of the loan and the acquisition of the shares are in the ordinary course of business and not as a means of circumventing this part; and

The shares so acquired shall be sold or disposed of at public or private sale within a period of one (1) year from the acquisition of the shares or by a later time that the appropriate regulatory officials deem required to permit the disposition of the shares without undue risk or loss;

Acquisition of shares of stock by a bank acting solely in a fiduciary capacity in the ordinary course of its trust business and not for the purpose of circumventing this part;

Acquisition of control of a bank by a company that will become a Tennessee bank holding company solely by reason of the acquisition; and

The acquisition of shares of a bank holding company by another bank holding company where more than fifty percent (50%) of the total consolidated assets of the holding company being acquired are held by banks in operation for more than three (3) years.

Acts 1974, ch. 469, § 3; 1979, ch. 76, § 1; T.C.A., § 45-621; Acts 1980, ch. 616, § 1; 1981, ch. 228, § 1; 1983, ch. 74, § 3; 1987, ch. 45, § 1; 1995, ch. 165, § 2; 1996, ch. 768, § 24; 2003, ch. 32, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 165, § 6 does not: (i) authorize or permit, prior to June 1, 1997, merger or consolidation of any bank having its home state, as defined in §45-2-1402, in Tennessee with or into any bank which does not have its home state in Tennessee; or (ii) authorize or permit, whether before, on, or after June 1, 1997, a bank which does not have its home state in Tennessee to establish or acquire a branch in Tennessee by any means other than merger or consolidation, on or after June 1, 1997, of such bank with or into a bank having its home state in Tennessee.

Acts 1996, ch. 768, which amended this section, is known and may be cited as the Bank Reform Act of 1996.

45-2-1404. Acquisition by holding company prohibited.

A bank or bank holding company shall be prohibited from acquiring any bank in Tennessee if the bank or bank holding company, including all insured depository institutions that are affiliates of the bank or bank holding company, upon consummation of the acquisition, would control thirty percent (30%) or more of the total amount of the deposits of the insured depository institutions in Tennessee. For purposes of this part, “deposit” has the meaning set forth in § 3(l ) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. § 1813(l )).

Acts 1974, ch. 469, § 4; T.C.A., § 45-622; Acts 1995, ch. 165, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 165, § 6 does not: (i) authorize or permit, prior to June 1, 1997, merger or consolidation of any bank having its home state, as defined hereinabove in §45-2-1402, in Tennessee with or into any bank which does not have its home state in Tennessee; or (ii) authorize or permit, whether before, on, or after June 1, 1997, a bank which does not have its home state in Tennessee to establish or acquire a branch in Tennessee by any means other than merger or consolidation, on or after June 1, 1997, of such bank with or into a bank having its home state in Tennessee.

45-2-1405. Power of commissioner.

The commissioner has the power to establish rules and regulations to carry out the legislative purposes of this part.

Acts 1974, ch. 469, § 5; T.C.A., § 45-623; Acts 1981, ch. 386, § 1; 1995, ch. 165, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former §45-2-1405 (Acts 1974, ch. 469, § 5; T.C.A., § 45-623; Acts 1981, ch. 386, § 1), prohibiting Tennessee holding companies from acquiring certain banks, was effectively repealed by Acts 1995, ch. 165, § 2, which rewrote the part but did not include this section.

Cross-References. Acquisitions of Tennessee bank holding companies or banks, title 45, ch. 12.

45-2-1406. [Reserved.]

An out-of-state state bank that establishes and maintains one (1) or more branches in Tennessee under this part may conduct any activities at the branch or branches that are authorized under the laws of this state for Tennessee state banks.

Notwithstanding any other state law to the contrary and in addition to any other activities a state bank may conduct, a Tennessee state bank may conduct any activities at any branch outside Tennessee that are permissible for a bank chartered by the host state where the branch is located, subject to regulation by the commissioner for the purpose of maintaining the state bank's safety and soundness.

Acts 1996, ch. 562, § 1.

Law Reviews.

1996 Real Estate Legislation: What You Don't Know Can Hurt You (William R. Bruce), 32 No. 6 Tenn. B.J. 12 (1996).

45-2-1408. Examinations — Periodic reports — Cooperative agreements — Assessment of fees.

To the extent consistent with subsection (c), the commissioner may make the examinations of any branch established and maintained in this state pursuant to this part by an out-of-state state bank that the commissioner deems necessary to determine whether the branch is being operated in compliance with the laws of this state and in accordance with safe and sound banking practices. The commissioner may also participate in examinations of out-of-state state banks that have branches located in Tennessee. The applicable provisions of § 45-2-1602 shall apply to the examinations.

The commissioner may prescribe requirements for periodic reports regarding any out-of-state bank that operates a branch in Tennessee pursuant to this part. The required reports shall be provided by the bank or may be provided by the bank supervisory agency having primary responsibility for the bank.

The commissioner may enter into cooperative, coordinating and information-sharing agreements with any other bank supervisory agencies or any organization affiliated with or representing one (1) or more bank supervisory agencies with respect to the periodic examination or other supervision of any branch in Tennessee of an out-of-state state bank, or any branch of a Tennessee state bank in any host state, and the commissioner may accept the parties' reports of examination and reports of investigation in lieu of conducting the commissioner's own examinations or investigations.

The commissioner may enter into contracts with any bank supervisory agency that has concurrent jurisdiction over a Tennessee state bank or an out-of-state state bank operating a branch in this state pursuant to this part to engage the services of the agency's examiners at a reasonable rate of compensation, or to provide the services of the commissioner's examiners to the agency at a reasonable rate of compensation to be paid by either the other bank supervisory agency or by the out-of-state state bank. The contract shall be deemed a sole source contract under Tennessee law.

The commissioner may enter into joint examinations or joint enforcement actions with other bank supervisory agencies having concurrent jurisdiction over any branch in Tennessee of an out-of-state state bank or any branch of a Tennessee state bank in any host state; provided, that the commissioner may at any time take such actions independently if the commissioner deems the actions to be necessary or appropriate to carry out the commissioner's responsibilities under this part or to ensure compliance with the laws of this state.

Each out-of-state state bank that maintains one (1) or more branches in this state may be assessed and, if assessed, shall pay supervisory and examination fees in accordance with the laws of this state and regulations of the commissioner. The fees, as well as a portion of the banking fee assessed on a Tennessee state bank that maintains one (1) or more branches in other states, may be shared with other bank supervisory agencies or any organization affiliated with or representing one (1) or more bank supervisory agencies in accordance with agreements between the parties and the commissioner.

In order to encourage the effective coordination and implementation of home state laws and host state laws with respect to interstate branching, the commissioner has the authority and the discretion to determine the applicability of Tennessee laws that are within the commissioner's regulatory authority as conferred by law to the operation of branches in Tennessee by out-of-state state banks.

Acts 1996, ch. 562, § 1; 1998, ch. 593, § 1.

45-2-1409. Notice and filing requirements.

Any out-of-state bank that will be the resulting bank pursuant to an interstate merger transaction involving a Tennessee state bank shall notify the commissioner of the proposed merger not later than the date on which it files an application for an interstate merger transaction with the responsible federal bank supervisory agency, and shall submit a copy of that application to the commissioner and pay the filing fee, if any, required by the commissioner. Any Tennessee state bank that is a party to the interstate merger transaction shall comply with all applicable state and federal laws. Any out-of-state bank that is the resulting bank in the interstate merger transaction shall provide satisfactory evidence to the commissioner of compliance with applicable requirements of Tennessee law.

Acts 1996, ch. 562, § 1.

45-2-1410. Notice of subsequent merger.

Each out-of-state state bank that has established and maintains a branch in this state pursuant to this part shall give at least thirty (30) days' prior written notice to the commissioner of any merger, consolidation, or other transaction that would cause a change of control with respect to the bank or any bank holding company that controls the bank, with the result that an application would be required to be filed pursuant to the federal Change In Bank Control Act of 1978 (12 U.S.C. § 1817(j)), or the federal Bank Holding Company Act of 1956 (12 U.S.C. § 1841 et seq.), or any successor statutes. In the case of an emergency transaction, the out-of-state state bank shall provide a shorter notice that is consistent with applicable state or federal law. The home state supervisory agency of the bank may provide the prior written notice required.

The notice requirement of subsection (a) shall apply to out-of-state trust institutions that maintain an office in this state pursuant to this chapter. The notice shall also be required of:

Any transfer of all or substantially all of the trust accounts or trust assets of the out-of-state trust institution to another person; or

The closing or disposition of any office in this state.

Acts 1996, ch. 562, § 1; 1999, ch. 112, § 12.

45-2-1411. Enforcement.

If the commissioner determines that a branch maintained by an out-of-state state bank or a trust office maintained by an out-of-state trust institution in this state is being operated in violation of any provision of the laws of this state, or is being operated in an unsafe and unsound manner, the commissioner shall have the authority to take all enforcement actions that the commissioner would be empowered to take if the branch or office were a Tennessee state bank; provided, that the commissioner shall promptly give notice to the home state supervisory agency of each enforcement action taken against an out-of-state state bank or out-of-state trust institution. To the extent practicable, the commissioner shall consult and cooperate with the home state supervisory agency in pursuing and resolving the enforcement action. The commissioner may issue an order temporarily or permanently prohibiting a trust institution from acting as a fiduciary in this state.

Acts 1996, ch. 562, § 1; 1999, ch. 112, § 13.

45-2-1412. Acquisition of branch by out-of-state bank.

An out-of-state bank that does not already maintain a branch in Tennessee and that meets the requirements of this title may establish and maintain a branch in Tennessee through the acquisition of a branch or establishment of a de novo branch.

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

No bank or out-of-state bank may establish or maintain a branch in this state on the premises or property of an affiliate if the affiliate engages in commercial activities.

Acts 1998, ch. 742, § 2; 2001, ch. 140, § 2; 2007, ch. 5, § 3; 2020, ch. 605, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 140, § 4 provided that should any provision of that act or the application thereof to any person or circumstance be held invalid for any reason by a final nonappealable order of any Tennessee or federal court of competent jurisdiction, then such court shall declare the entire act to be null and void in its entirety and shall give no further force or effect to it; provided, however, that any transaction that has been finally consummated in good faith pursuant to that act prior to a determination of invalidity, and which is not the subject of dispute or litigation, shall be unaffected by such determination.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted (b), which read, “No branch of an out-of-state bank may be established through the acquisition of a branch or establishment of a de novo branch, unless the laws of the home state of the out-of-state bank permit Tennessee banks to establish and maintain branches in that state through the acquisition of a branch or establishment of a de novo branch under substantially the same terms and conditions as set forth in this title.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 605, § 10. March 20, 2020.

Cross-References. Riegle-Neal Interstate Banking and Branching Efficiency Act of 1994, Pub. L. 103-328, 108 Stat. 2338 (1994) (codified in various sections of 12 U.S.C. (1994)).